Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-907
Remedies; cumulative.

The remedies herein provided are cumulative and shall be in addition to any other remedies, civil or criminal, now or hereafter provided by law.

Laws 1959, c. 231, § 7, p. 809.